Utah statutes.
23-19-47.   Portion of revenue from license, permit, stamp, certificate of registration, and Wildlife Heritage certificate fees deposited in Wildlife Habitat Account.

(1)  Fifty cents of the fee charged for any of the following licenses or stamps shall be deposited in the Wildlife Habitat Account created in Section 23-19-43:

(a)  a one-day fishing license; or

(b)  a one-day fishing stamp.

(2)  Three dollars and fifty cents of the fee charged for any of the following licenses or permits shall be deposited in the Wildlife Habitat Account created in Section 23-19-43:

(a)  a fishing license, except any one-day fishing license;

(b)  a hunting license;

(c)  a combination license;

(d)  a furbearer license; or

(e)  a fishing permit, except any fish stamp.

(3)  Four dollars and seventy-five cents of the fee charged for any of the following certificates of registration, permits, or Wildlife Heritage certificates shall be deposited in the Wildlife Habitat Account created in Section 23-19-43:

(a)  a certificate of registration for the dedicated hunter program, except a certificate of registration issued to a lifetime licensee;

(b)  a big game permit;

(c)  a bear permit;

(d)  a cougar permit;

(e)  a turkey permit;

(f)  a muskrat permit; or

(g)  a Wildlife Heritage certificate.

